District of Columbia statutes.
4-1341.02

Establishment of the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund.

(a)

There is established in the District of Columbia a private nonprofit corporation which shall be known as the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund (“Trust Fund”). The sole purpose of the Trust Fund is to encourage child abuse and child neglect prevention programs.

(b)

The Trust Fund may accept appropriations from the District and shall accept gifts, bequests and grants from persons, organizations, corporations and foundations.

(c)

The Trust Fund shall accept federal funds granted by Congress or Executive Order.

(d)

Repealed.

(d-1)

The Trust Fund may hold and distribute funds for other organizations. Auditing procedures shall be established by the Board.

(e)

Repealed.

(f)

Repealed.

(g)

The Trust Fund shall supplement but not replace services provided by District agencies.

(h)

The Trust Fund shall not provide funding to District government agencies.

Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 3, 40 DCR 7222
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 7, 41 DCR 2597
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-233, § 2(a), 46 DCR 564
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-484, October 8, 1998, 45 DCR 8030), and § 2(a) of the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-618, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1337).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-141, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4854), see § 2(a) of the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-182, October 30, 1997, 44 DCR 6956), and see § 2(a) of the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-252, January 29, 1998, 45 DCR 901).
For temporary amendments of section, see § 7 of the South Africa Sanctions Emergency Repeal Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-127, October 25, 1993, 40 DCR 7583) and § 7 of the South Africa Sanctions Congressional Recess Emergency Repeal Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-176, January 25, 1994, 41 DCR 512).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 4-1341.01.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Children’s Trust Fund Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-51, February 27, 1998, law notification 45 DCR ).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of South Africa Sanctions Repeal Act 1993 (D.C. Law 10-75, March 8, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1518).
1981 Ed., § 6-2132.